Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1710
Services, defined.

Services shall mean any assistance, guidance, direction, work, labor, or services provided by the seller to initiate or maintain the seller-assisted marketing plan.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 10.